Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 7. Education; State Institutions; Promotion of Health and Morals; Public Buildings
§ 19. Territorial institutions pass to state.

The property of all charitable and penal institutions belonging to the Territory of Wyoming shall, upon the adoption of this constitution, become the property of the State of Wyoming, and such of said institutions as are then in actual operation, shall thereafter have the supervision of the board of charities and reform as provided in the last preceding section of this article, under provisions of the legislature.

Appropriations for institutions mentioned herein are constitutional.

State v. Board of Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 104, 55 P. 451,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1898).

Public Health and Morals

§ 20. Duty of legislature to protect and promote health and morality of people.

As the health and morality of the people are essential to their well-being, and to the peace and permanence of the state, it shall be the duty of the legislature to protect and promote these vital interests by such measures for the encouragement of temperance and virtue, and such restrictions upon vice and immorality of every sort, as are deemed necessary to the public welfare.

Cross references. —

As to offenses against morality and decency generally, see §§

6-4-101

through

6-4-502

,

6-6-201

through

6-6-209

.

As to public health and safety generally, see title 35.

Constitutionality of statutes. —

The constitutionality of a statute will not be passed on unless the decision is necessary to the determination of the pending controversy. State v. Kelley, 17 Wyo. 335, 98 P. 886,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1909).

Law reviews. —

For note dealing with fluoridation of municipal water systems, see 10 Wyo. L.J. 153.

For comment, “The Constitutionality of Automobile Compensation Plans in Wyoming,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 191 (1970).

Public Buildings

§ 21. Buildings and property of territory pass to state.

All public buildings and other property, belonging to the territory shall, upon the adoption of this constitution, become the property of the State of Wyoming.

Cross references. —

As to public property and contracts generally, see §§

9-5-101

through

9-5-205

and chapter 6 of title 16.

§ 22. Construction and supervision.

The construction, care and preservation of all public buildings of the state not under the control of the board or officers of public institutions by authority of law shall be entrusted to such officers or boards, and under such regulations as shall be prescribed by law.

§ 23. Permanent location.

The legislature shall have no power to change or to locate the seat of government, the state university, or state hospital, but may provide by law for submitting the question of the permanent locations thereof respectively, to the qualified electors of the state, at some general election, and a majority of all votes upon said question cast at said election, shall be necessary to determine the location thereof; but until the same are respectively and permanently located, as herein provided, the location of the seat of government and said institutions shall be as follows: The seat of government shall be located at the City of Cheyenne, in the County of Laramie. The state university shall be centered at the City of Laramie, in the County of Albany. The state hospital shall be located at or near the City of Evanston, in the County of Uinta. A penitentiary shall be located at or near the City of Rawlins, in the County of Carbon. The legislature may provide by law the location of other public institutions, including correctional facilities. (As amended by Laws 1978, Sp. Sess., House Joint Resolution No. 1A, p. 492.)

Cross references. —

As to University of Wyoming, see §§

21-17-101

to

21-17-450

.

As to state penitentiary generally, see §§

25-2-101

to

25-2-103

.

As to state hospital for the insane, see §§

25-10-101

to

25-10-126

.

Agricultural college. —

The legislature could repeal an act establishing the agricultural college, which was located by a vote of the people. State ex rel. Wyoming Agric. College v. Irvine, 14 Wyo. 318, 84 P. 90,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1906), aff'd, 206 U.S. 278, 27 S. Ct. 613, 51 L. Ed. 1063, 1907 U.S. LEXIS 1163 (U.S. 1907).

Appropriation for the completion and repair of penitentiary buildings is proper

under this section. State v. Board of Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 104, 55 P. 451,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1898).

Cited

in

Simpkin v. Rock Springs, 33 Wyo. 166, 237 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1925).